it: Stile di costruzione del sassofono: Poggiadito regolabile; Campana incisa a mano; Chiave del Fa# acuto; Campana incisa a macchina; Costruzione con colonnine saldate sul corpo; Costruzione con nervature (Ribbed); Altro
cs: Styl konstrukce saxofonu: Nastavitelná opěrka palce; Ručně gravírovaný ozvučník; Klapka vysokého Fis; Strojově gravírovaný ozvučník; Sloupky pájené na tělo; Žebrovaná konstrukce; Jiné
ro-RO: Stilul de construcție al saxofonului: Suport ajustabil pentru degetul mare; Pâlnie gravată manual; Clapă Fa# acut; Pâlnie gravată mecanic; Construcție cu stâlpi lipiți pe corp; Construcție cu nervuri; Altele
tr: Saksafon yapım tarzı: Ayarlanabilir başparmak dayanağı; Elle işlenmiş kalak; Yüksek F# tuşu; Makineyle işlenmiş kalak; Gövdeye doğrudan direk bağlantısı; Şeritli yapı; Diğer
ko: 색소폰 제작 방식: 조절식 엄지 받침대; 수제 인그레이빙 벨; 하이 F# 키; 기계 인그레이빙 벨; 포스트 투 바디 구조; 리브드 구조; 기타
pt-PT: Estilo de construção do saxofone: Descanso de polegar ajustável; Campânula gravada à mão; Chave de Fá# agudo; Campânula gravada à máquina; Construção de espigão ao corpo; Construção nervurada; Outro
hu: Szaxofon felépítési stílusa: Állítható hüvelykujjtámasz; Kézzel gravírozott tölcsér; Magas F# billentyű; Géppel gravírozott tölcsér; Post-to-body felépítés; Bordázott felépítés; Egyéb
zh-TW: 薩克斯風結構樣式: 可調式拇指靠座; 手工雕花喇叭口; 高音 F# 鍵; 機器雕花喇叭口; 單柱式結構; 聯體鍵柱結構; 其他
ru: Конструкция саксофона: Регулируемый упор для большого пальца; Раструб с ручной гравировкой; Клавиша верхнего фа-диеза; Раструб с машинной гравировкой; Стойки, припаянные к корпусу; Стойки на планках; Другое
nl: Saxofoon constructiestijl: Verstelbare duimsteun; Handgegraveerde beker; Hoge F#-klep; Machinegegraveerde beker; Post-to-body-constructie; Geribbelde constructie; Overige
es: Estilo de construcción de saxofones: Apoyo para el pulgar ajustable; Campana grabada a mano; Llave de fa sostenido agudo; Campana grabada a máquina; Construcción de postes soldados al cuerpo; Construcción acanalada; Otro
bg-BG: Стил на конструкцията на саксофона: Регулируема опора за палеца; Ръчно гравирана камбана; Клапа за горно Фа диез; Машинно гравирана камбана; Конструкция с колонки към тялото; Оребрена конструкция; Друго
lt-LT: Saksofono konstrukcijos stilius: Reguliuojama nykščio atrama; Rankomis graviruotas varpas; Aukšto F# klavišas; Mašinomis graviruotas varpas; Tiesioginis tvirtinimas prie korpuso; Briaunota konstrukcija; Kita
hr-HR: Stil konstrukcije saksofona: Podesiv oslonac za palac; Ručno gravirano zvono; Tipka za visoki F#; Strojno gravirano zvono; Konstrukcija s držačima na tijelu (post-to-body); Rebrasta konstrukcija; Ostalo
en: Saxophone construction style: Adjustable thumb rest; Hand engraved bell; High F# key; Machine engraved bell; Post-to-body construction; Ribbed construction; Other
el: Στυλ κατασκευής σαξοφώνου: Ρυθμιζόμενο στήριγμα αντίχειρα; Χειροποίητα σκαλισμένη καμπάνα; Κλειδί ψηλού Φα#; Σκαλισμένη καμπάνα με μηχάνημα; Κατασκευή με βάσεις στο σώμα (Post-to-body); Ενισχυμένη κατασκευή (Ribbed); Άλλο
fi: Saksofonin rakenteen tyyli: Säädettävä peukalotuki; Käsin kaiverrettu kello; Korkea F#-läppä; Koneellisesti kaiverrettu kello; Suoraan runkoon juotetut tolpat; Kiskorakenne; Muu
pl: Styl konstrukcji saksofonu: Regulowana podpórka pod kciuk; Ręcznie grawerowana czara; Klapka wysokiego Fis; Maszynowo grawerowana czara; Konstrukcja Post-to-body; Konstrukcja żebrowana; Inny
nb: Saksofonkonstruksjons-stil: Justerbar tommelstøtte; Håndgravert sjallstykke; Høy F#-klaff; Maskingravert sjallstykke; Stolpe-til-kropp-konstruksjon; Ribbet konstruksjon; Annet
zh-CN: 萨克斯管结构类型: 可调节拇指托; 手工雕花喇叭口; 高音 F# 键; 机器雕花喇叭口; 独立焊柱结构; 连体焊柱结构; 其他
th: รูปแบบโครงสร้างแซกโซโฟน: ที่พักนิ้วโป้งแบบปรับได้; ปากแตรแกะสลักด้วยมือ; คีย์HighF#; ปากแตรแกะสลักด้วยเครื่องจักร; โครงสร้างแบบโพสต์ทูบอดี้; โครงสร้างแบบมีกระดูกงู(Ribbed); อื่นๆ
de: Bauweise des Saxophons: Verstellbarer Daumenhalter; Handgravierter Schallbecher; Hoch-Fis-Klappe; Maschinengravierter Schallbecher; Böckchen auf Korpus verlötet; Gerippte Konstruktion; Sonstige
sv: Saxofonens konstruktionsstil: Justerbart tumstöd; Handgraverat klockstycke; Hög F#-klaff; Maskingraverat klockstycke; Stolpar monterade direkt på kroppen; Ribbad konstruktion; Övrigt
pt-BR: Saxofone estilo de construção: Apoio de polegar ajustável; Campânula gravada à mão; Chave de Fá sustenido agudo; Campânula gravada à máquina; Construção de poste no corpo; Construção com nervuras; Outros
vi: Kiểu cấu tạo kèn saxophone: Điểm tựa ngón cái có thể điều chỉnh; Loa kèn khắc thủ công; Phím F# cao; Loa kèn khắc bằng máy; Cấu trúc Post-to-body; Cấu trúc có nẹp (Ribbed); Khác
sk-SK: Štýl konštrukcie saxofónu: Nastaviteľná opierka palca; Ručne gravírovaný ozvučník; Klapka vysokého Fis (F#); Strojovo gravírovaný ozvučník; Konštrukcia stĺpik na telo (Post-to-body); Rebrovaná konštrukcia; Iné
sl-SI: Stil izdelave saksofona: Prilagodljiv naslon za palec; Ročno graviran odmevnik; Tipka visoki Fis; Strojno graviran odmevnik; Konstrukcija s pritrditvijo na trup (Post-to-body); Rebrasta konstrukcija; Drugo
ja: サックスの構造スタイル: 可動式サムレスト; 手彫り彫刻ベル; High F# キー; 機械彫刻ベル; ポストトゥボディ構造; リブ構造; その他
fr: Type de construction du saxophone: Repose-pouce réglable; Pavillon gravé à la main; Clé de fa# aigu; Pavillon gravé à la machine; Tiges montées sur le corps; Tiges montées sur plaques (ribbed); Autre
da: Saxofonkonstruktionstil: Justerbar tommelstøtte; Håndgraveret klangstykke; Høj F#-klap; Maskingraveret klangstykke; Post-to-body-konstruktion; Ribbet konstruktion; Andet